Utah statutes.
26-15-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  "Food handler" means any person working part-time or full-time in a food service establishment who moves food or food containers, prepares, stores, or serves food; comes in contact with any food, utensil, tableware or equipment; or washes the same.  The term also includes owners, supervisors, and management persons, and any other person working in a food-service establishment.  The term also includes any operator or person employed by one who handles food dispensed through vending machines; or who comes into contact with food contact surfaces or containers, equipment, utensils, or packaging materials used in connection with vending machine operations; or who otherwise services or maintains one or more vending machines.

(b)  "Food handler" does not include a producer of food products selling food at a farmers market as defined in Subsection 4-5-2(5).

(2)  "Pest" means a noxious, destructive, or troublesome organism whether plant or animal, when found in and around places of human occupancy, habitation, or use which threatens the public health or well being of the people within the state.

(3)  "Vector" means any organism, such as insects or rodents, that transmits a pathogen that can affect public health.

